Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1719.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 35-181.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE35-181.03. Audit of nonprofit corporations receiving state monies; definition A. All state contracts with nonprofit corporations for assistance shall include requirements concerning financial and compliance audits. B. For years ending in 0 and 5, each nonprofit corporation that receives in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars more than $250,000 in state assistance in any each of the previous five fiscal year years shall file for each such fiscal year the previous five years at the corporation's expense with the grantor agency either audited financial statements prepared in accordance with federal single audit regulations or financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and audited by an independent certified public accountant. C. Each nonprofit corporation receiving two hundred fifty thousand dollars or less in state assistance in any fiscal year shall comply with contract requirements concerning financial and compliance audits contained in contract agreements governing such programs. D. For the purposes of this section, "nonprofit corporation" means a corporation as defined in section 10-3140. END_STATUTE